Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
Dated April 15, 2021

ADDENDUM 15 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Use of Facial Coverings and Temporary Restrictions on Hours of Operation]

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency (“Executive Order”), as amended and restated June 15, 2020 (“Amended and Restated Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the
State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, all states in the region, including Vermont, have experienced community transmission of COVID-19 which has led to hundreds of thousands of cases and thousands of deaths within a five hour drive of Vermont’s borders; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health (VDH), has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this health emergency including issuing the Executive
Order, as amended and restated, and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through
the end of the 2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring
Vermonters to stay home and stay safe with exceptions for essential purposes and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security;
and

WHEREAS, beginning in April 2020, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities to protect the most vulnerable,
while reopening business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, in connection with the Governor’s cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy in a safe and effective way, on April 20, 2020, the Governor issued Addendum 10 to the Executive Order that established health and safety
requirements to be followed by all employers and employees, including mandatory facial coverings for employees when in the presence of others, and strongly encouraged all Vermonters to wear facial coverings when in
the presence of others; and

WHEREAS, on May 1, 2020 the Governor issued Addendum 12 to the Executive Order that required facial coverings on public transit conveyances, including ride services, and in mass transportation facilities; and

WHEREAS, on June 15, 2020, the Governor issued an Amended and Restated Executive Order which reiterated existing mask policies and recommended Vermonters use facial coverings when in contact with individuals from outside their household, and especially
when maintaining a physical distance of six feet was not possible; and

WHEREAS, on July 24, 2020, in anticipation of colder weather, more frequent indoor gatherings and the coming flu season, the Governor issued Addendum 2 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order directing all Vermonters to wear masks or cloth facial
coverings over their nose and mouth in most instances when they are in public spaces, and in contact with others from outside their households; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken by the Governor, the number of COVID-19 hospitalizations and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would have had a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and threatened to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the mitigation measures taken in 2020, including significant testing and contact tracing capacity, mask-wearing and other health and safety protocols, substantial federal financial aid, food distribution and emergency housing, prepared Vermonters,
healthcare institutions and schools for the spike in COVID-19 cases in late fall and early winter to such an extent Vermont was able to avoid a substantial roll-back of Vermont’s ongoing restart efforts; and

WHEREAS, thanks to the initiation of Vermont’s nation-leading vaccination program and continued adherence by Vermonters to the State’s safety measures and substantial uptake of vaccine, Vermont is now seeing significant decreases in its rate of hospitalizations
and deaths; and

WHEREAS, this trend has allowed the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD), in consultation with VDH, with the approval of the Governor, to release the Vermont Forward Roadmap to Reopening: Phased Reopening Plan (“Vermont Forward”), to relieve
restrictions on the operations of businesses and non-profit and government entities as certain vaccination goals are met; and

WHEREAS, the CDC has recently acknowledged, and the science and data strongly indicate that, transmission of COVID-19 in outdoor settings is very rare, the Governor, in consultation with VDH, the Department of Financial Regulation and the Department of
Public Safety, has determined that the data and conditions in Vermont support further reducing restrictions on all Vermonters when outside.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, Chapter II, Section 20 and under 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11, hereby order the amendment of the Amended and Restated
Executive Order as follows:

1.

Rescission of Addendum.
Addendum 2 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order is hereby rescinded.

2.

Mask Use.
Section 7(f) of the Amended and Restated Executive Order regarding Mask Use is hereby amended in its entirety to read as follows:

(f)
Masks or Cloth Facial Coverings.

As of Friday, April 30, 2021, Vermonters are no longer required to wear face coverings over nose and mouth when they are in outdoor public spaces, provided sustained or prolonged close contact with individuals from outside their household can be avoided.

For clarity, “sustained or prolonged contact” is defined as more than several minutes. “Close contact” is defined as being less than six-feet from an individual from outside your household. For example, masking would not be required when passing someone
on the sidewalk or at an outdoor market. Put another way, when you are outdoors, masks are only required when you are in a crowd or with multiple other households where you cannot avoid close contact.

The Commissioner of VDH, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby delegated the authority to implement and update guidance regarding the use of masks or cloth facial coverings required indoors or outdoors in public.

Nothing in this Order or any other State health and safety guidance shall require the use of a mask or cloth facial covering when someone is engaged in strenuous exercise or activity, for anyone under the age of 2, any child or adult with a medical or
developmental issue or challenge that is complicated or irritated by a facial covering, anyone with difficulty breathing or as further set forth in guidance issued by VDH. A person who declines to wear a mask or cloth
face covering because of a medical or developmental issue, or difficulty breathing, shall not be required to produce documentation, or other evidence, verifying the condition.

Businesses and non-profit and government entities shall continue to implement measures notifying customers or clients of the requirement to wear masks or facial coverings in public indoor spaces. This notice may include, but shall not be limited to, posting
signage stating that masks or cloth facial coverings are required and denial of entry or service to customers or clients who decline to wear masks or facial coverings.

For the sake of clarity, the requirements for masks or facial coverings or permitted alternatives in specific circumstances shall continue to apply as set forth in the following guidance:

• Vermont Forward, permitting limited alternatives to face masks in limited workplace settings, as well as some flexibility on use of masks or facial coverings in other circumstances, such as when eating in a restaurant;

• A Strong and Healthy Year: Safety and Health Guidance for Vermont Schools, Spring 2021 issued by the Secretary of the Agency of Education (AoE);

• Health Guidance for Childcare and School Age Camps/Care issued by the VDH, AoE and the Department for Children and Families;

• Guidance to Healthcare Providers issued by the VDH; and

• Other as set by a designated Secretary or Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor.

The legislative body of each municipality may enact more strict local requirements regarding mask use than those set forth herein. Businesses may also enact more strict requirements regarding mask use than those set forth herein.

To support further relaxation of restrictions, and a return to normal operations and full mobility, municipalities and businesses should encourage all residents, employees and customers to be vaccinated at the earliest opportunity.

3.

Temporary Limitations on Business Operations and Social Gatherings.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Vermont Forward plan, restaurants, catering, food service, social clubs and bars must cease service at 10:00 pm each night, until the Secretary of ACCD,
in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH, and with the approval of the Governor, lifts this restriction.

4.

Unemployment Insurance; Work Search.
Effective May 9, 2021, Section 5(a) of the Amended and Restated Executive Order is hereby modified to direct the Commissioner of the Department of Labor to reinstitute the work search requirement for
all workers seeking unemployment benefits.

This Addendum 15 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and
the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated April 30, 2021

ADDENDUM 16 TO AMENDED AND RESTATED EXECUTIVE ORDER NO. 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020; and Use of Facial Coverings]

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency (“Executive Order”), as amended and restated June 15, 2020 (“Amended and Restated Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the
State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, all states in the region, including Vermont, have experienced community transmission of COVID-19 which led to hundreds of thousands of cases and thousands of deaths within a five hour drive of Vermont’s borders; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health (VDH), has initiated sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this health emergency including issuing the Executive Order, as amended
and restated, and Directives issued pursuant to the Executive Order to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the
2019-2020 school year, directing the postponement of non-essential medical and surgical procedures, suspending the operation of close contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters
to stay home and stay safe with exceptions for essential purposes and suspending the operation of businesses which were not deemed critical to public health and safety and national and economic security; and

WHEREAS, beginning in April 2020, the Governor undertook a cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy to minimize the risk to the public by limiting the spread of infection in our communities to protect the most vulnerable,
while reopening business, non-profit, government and recreation sectors in a safe and effective way; and

WHEREAS, in connection with the Governor’s cautious, measured and data-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy in a safe and effective way, on April 20, 2020, the Governor issued Addendum 10 to the Executive Order that established health and safety
requirements to be followed by all employers and employees, including mandatory facial coverings for employees when in the presence of others, and strongly encouraged all Vermonters to wear facial coverings when in
the presence of others; and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken by the Governor, the number of COVID-19 hospitalizations and COVID-19 related deaths in the State would have had a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and threatened to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the mitigation measures taken in 2020 and 2021, including significant testing and contact tracing capacity, mask-wearing and other health and safety protocols, substantial federal financial aid, food distribution and emergency housing, prepared
Vermonters, healthcare institutions and schools for the spike in COVID-19 cases in late fall and early winter to such an extent Vermont was able to avoid a substantial roll-back of Vermont’s ongoing restart efforts;
and

WHEREAS, thanks to the initiation of Vermont’s nation-leading vaccination program and continued adherence by Vermonters to the State’s safety measures and substantial uptake of vaccine, Vermont is now seeing significant decreases in its rate of hospitalizations
and deaths; and

WHEREAS, this trend has allowed the Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD), in consultation with VDH, with the approval of the Governor, to release the Vermont Forward Roadmap to Reopening: Phased Reopening Plan (“Vermont Forward”), to relieve
restrictions on the operations of businesses and non-profit and government entities as certain vaccination goals are met; and

WHEREAS, the CDC has recently issued new guidance, based on the science and data, that COVID-19 vaccines are highly effective at preventing COVID-19 infections and, in the very rare instances where a fully vaccinated person contracts the virus, that fully
vaccinated person has a far less severe, often asymptomatic, case and there is low risk of transmitting COVID-19 to unvaccinated people; and

WHEREAS, in light of this updated CDC guidance the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Department of Public Safety, has determined that the data and conditions in Vermont support removing facial covering requirements for fully vaccinated people
in most situations; and

WHEREAS, numerous tools needed to address response efforts remain in place by virtue of the State of Emergency declaration, including protections for residents of long term and other medical care facilities, licensing and regulatory flexibility needed
to facilitate the medical response, health and safety requirements, expanded housing and meal delivery systems, moratoria on evictions and water and sewer service disconnection, expanded eligibility for unemployment
insurance, tools needed by certain businesses to maintain a minimum level of economic sustainability, and federal emergency funding; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of VDH and the Department of Public Safety, based on the best science and data available, to extend the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont, effective Saturday May 15,
2021 through Tuesday, June 15, 2021.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby declare, effective Saturday
May 15, 2021, the State of Emergency for the State of Vermont shall be extended through midnight on Tuesday, June 15, 2021.

IT IS FURTHER ORDERED:

1.
Effective May 15, 2021, the Executive Order, as Amended and Restated June 5, 2020, and all amendments, Addenda and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight
on June 15, 2021, at which time the Governor, in consultation with VDH and DPS shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the State of Emergency.

2.

Mask Use.
Section 7(f) of the Amended and Restated Executive Order regarding Mask Use is hereby amended in its entirety to read as follows:

(f)
Masks or Cloth Facial Coverings.

(i)

Fully Vaccinated People.
Effective immediately, fully vaccinated people can resume activities without wearing a face covering over nose and mouth or physically distancing, except where required by federal, State or local laws,
rules, and regulations, including local business and workplace guidance.

For the purposes of this section, people are considered fully vaccinated for COVID-19 two weeks after they have received the second dose in a series of the Pfizer or Moderna vaccine, or 2 weeks after they have received a single-dose of the Johnson and
Johnson vaccine.

(ii)

Unvaccinated People.
Unvaccinated people are not required to wear face coverings over nose and mouth when they are in outdoor public spaces, provided sustained or prolonged close contact with other unvaccinated people
from outside their household can be avoided.

For the purposes of this section, people of all ages, including children, are considered unvaccinated when they have not completed a vaccination series.

For clarity, “sustained or prolonged contact” is defined as more than several minutes. “Close contact” is defined as being less than six feet from an individual from outside your household. For example, masking would not be required when passing someone
on the sidewalk or at an outdoor market. Put another way, when you are outdoors, masks are only required when you are in a crowd or with multiple other households where you cannot avoid close contact.

The Commissioner of VDH, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby delegated the authority to implement and update guidance required for unvaccinated people regarding the use of masks or cloth facial coverings indoors or outdoors in in public.

Nothing in this Order or any other State health and safety guidance shall require the use of a mask or cloth facial covering by any person when someone is engaged in strenuous exercise or activity, for anyone under the age of 2, any child or adult with
a medical or developmental issue or challenge that is complicated or irritated by a facial covering, anyone with difficulty breathing or as further set forth in guidance issued by VDH. A person who declines to wear
a mask or cloth face covering because of a medical or developmental issue, or difficulty breathing, shall not be required to produce documentation, or other evidence, verifying the condition.

Businesses and non-profit and government entities shall continue to implement measures notifying unvaccinated customers or clients of the requirement to wear masks or facial coverings in public indoor spaces. This notice may include, but shall not be
limited to, posting signage stating that masks or cloth facial coverings are required and denial of entry or service to customers or clients who decline to wear masks or facial coverings.

For the sake of clarity, the requirements for masks or facial coverings or permitted alternatives in specific circumstances shall continue to apply as set forth in the following guidance:

• Vermont Forward, permitting limited alternatives to face masks in limited workplace settings, as well as some flexibility on use of masks or facial coverings in other circumstances, such as when eating in a restaurant;

• A Strong and Healthy Year: Safety and Health Guidance for Vermont Schools, Spring 2021 issued by the Secretary of the Agency of Education (AoE);

• Health Guidance for Childcare and School Age Camps/Care issued by the VDH, AoE and the Department for Children and Families;

• Guidance to Healthcare Providers issued by the VDH; and

• Other as set by a designated Secretary or Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor.

The legislative body of each municipality may enact more strict local requirements regarding mask use than those set forth herein. Businesses may also enact more strict requirements regarding mask use than those set forth herein.

To support further relaxation of restrictions, and a return to normal operations and full mobility, municipalities and businesses should encourage all residents, employees and customers to be vaccinated at the earliest opportunity.

This Addendum 16 to the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall take effect upon signing. Effective May 15, 2021, the Amended and Restated Executive Order shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on June 15, 2021, at which time the Governor,
in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend the Amended and Restated Executive Order, including the Addenda
and Directives thereto.

Dated May 14, 2021

GUBERNATORIAL DIRECTIVE TO ALL SCHOOL BOARDS AND SUPERINTENDENTS

DIRECTIVE 1 — CONTINUITY OF EDUCATION PLANNING

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued an Executive Order declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, additional cases of COVID-19 have been tested as presumptively positive in the State; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health and the Secretary of Education, to proceed with an orderly dismissal of schools in Vermont to support both the State’s response to COVID-19 and the needs of children
and families across Vermont; and

WHEREAS, this decision is based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at the Vermont Department of Health and is expected to help prevent and reduce the spread of COVID-19.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby direct the governing bodies
of all public and independent schools as follows:

1.
All public schools and independent schools shall be dismissed, and all school related activities shall be cancelled, no later than Wednesday, March 18, 2020.

2.
No student shall be required to be in school Monday, March 16, 2020 or Tuesday, March 17, 2020, if necessary, to address the concerns of parents or guardians in response to COVID-19.

3.
In order to meet the needs of students and prepare for the potential for an extended dismissal, each school district and independent school must develop a Continuity of Education Plan that includes, at
a minimum:

a.
Meal service for those students who need it;

b.
Continued services for children with disabilities and special needs;

c.
District-based options, developed in collaboration with the State, that meet the childcare needs of healthcare workers and other Vermonters essential to the response (such as doctors, nurses, healthcare
technicians, emergency medical service providers, fire service, law enforcement officers, emergency management officials and National Guard personnel);

d.
Systems for ensuring maintenance of education for students, such as educational materials and assignments, when schools are dismissed Tuesday; and

e.
Developing a remote learning plan that ensures continuity of education if schools are dismissed for an extended period.

4.
School districts with Continuity of Education Plans in place that meet these directives may elect to close before Wednesday, March 18, 2020. All schools shall be closed for instruction at the end of the
school day on Tuesday.

5.
All schools shall remain operational for administrators, teachers and staff to sustain essential services and to plan and implement continuity of education through remote learning.

6.
All school administrators, teachers and staff shall follow guidance issued by the Department of Health to ensure a healthy workplace.

7.
Pursuant to the powers granted to the Governor in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other provisions of law, I shall from time to time issue recommendations, directives and orders as circumstances may require.

8.
The Secretary of Education shall oversee the implementation of this Directive and I hereby delegate to the Secretary of Education such authority as may be necessary for this implementation. All local
school officials and governing bodies shall consult with and abide by the direction of the Secretary of Education with respect to compliance with this Directive. School officials shall work with and assist the Agency
of Education as directed by the Secretary of Education.

This Directive shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 6, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management
and the Agency of Education shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Directive.

Dated March 15, 2020

GUBERNATORIAL DIRECTIVE TO ALL SCHOOL BOARDS, SUPERINTENDENTS, AND CHILD CARE PROGRAMS

DIRECTIVE 2 — PROVISION OF SERVICES TO CHILDREN OF ESSENTIAL PERSONS DURING CLOSURE PERIOD IN RESPONSE TO COVID-19

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued an Executive Order declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, on Sunday, March 15, 2020, the Governor issued a Directive to all school boards and superintendents dismissing schools from March 18, 2020 through April 6, 2020 (“Closure Period”) and regarding Continuity of Education Planning, which Directive
remains in full force and effect except as amended herein; and

WHEREAS, that Directive delegated authority to the Secretary of the Agency of Education (“Education Secretary”) to oversee its implementation, including with respect to provision of care for children of Essential Persons, defined below, during the Closure
Period; and

WHEREAS, provision of services for the children of Essential Persons from 0 through grade 8 during the Closure Period is necessary to support the State of Vermont in its response to COVID-19 and the needs of children and families of Essential Persons
across Vermont; and

WHEREAS, this decision is based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at the Vermont Department of Health and is expected to help provide the necessary care and services to prevent and reduce the spread of COVID-19.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby direct as follows:

1.
Except as set forth below, all state regulated child care programs shall be closed no later than Wednesday, March 18, 2020 through April 6, 2020 (“Closure Period”).

2
I hereby amend my Directive to the Education Secretary of March 15, 2020 as set forth below regarding provision of care for students who are children of Essential Persons, as defined below.

3.

Provision of services for children of Essential Persons:
With respect to provision of services for children of Essential Persons, this Directive provides emergency operating guidelines and applies to all schools under the authority of the Education Secretary
for pre-K through grade 8 and all state-licensed child care programs. I encourage other private child care programs, private schools and independent schools to do their utmost to fulfill the spirit and guidance of this
Directive.

4.
Essential Persons are those absolutely critical to the State’s response to COVID-19 and continued public health and safety. Specifically, “Essential Persons” are defined as staff and providers of child
care and education services (including custodial and kitchen staff and other support staff) for children of other Essential Persons, including custodial and kitchen staff; providers of healthcare including but not limited
to workers at clinics, hospitals, Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs); nursing homes, long-term care and post-acute care facilities, respite houses, VNAs; designated agencies, emergency medical services; criminal
justice personnel including those in law enforcement, courts, and correctional services; public health employees; firefighters; Vermont National Guard personnel called to duty for this response; other first responders;
and state employees determined to be essential for response to this crisis by the State Emergency Operations Center.

5.
Every child care program, school and school district has different circumstances and needs. However, the State will do everything possible to provide overarching guidance through Vermont Department of
Health (“VDH”), Vermont Agency of Education (“VAOE”), Vermont Department of Children and Families, Child Development Division (“DCF” and “CDD”) on approaches to operating during the Closure Period for services to children
of Essential Persons, including hygiene and social distancing within schools and facilities as directed by VDH.

6.
With respect to schools under the authority of the Education Secretary, the Education Secretary shall ensure that:

a.
School employees are to report to work in accordance with applicable labor agreements and as required by their employers to assist with providing services to children of Essential Persons and Continuity
of Education Planning as previously directed.

b.
During the Closure Period, schools are directed to provide care to, at a minimum, students through grade 8 who are children of Essential Persons. In providing this care, schools must practice hygiene
and social distancing best practices as set forth by VDH guidance.

c.
Districts plan for and provide as resources allow extended care — before and after normal school hours and days — to students who are children of Essential Persons, recognizing that COVID-19 response
may require extended working hours by our Essential Persons.

d.
Schools providing pre-K services under Act 166 continue to receive funding allocated to them during the Closure Period and all schools shall continue to receive State Education Fund allocations for enrolled
students, regardless of actual daily attendance, throughout the Closure Period.

e.
Schools and school districts, in cooperation with state agencies, work to support families most impacted by this crisis, including, but not limited to, low-income families. During the Closure Period,
school districts are expected to work with their schools and communities to continue to provide meals to their students, utilizing the Education Secretary’s authority to assist with necessary waivers and to provide
additional guidance on meal continuity.

f.
Planning occurs to provide additional funding as may be needed to schools to ensure continuity of services to children of Essential Persons during the Closure Period.

g.
Districts are encouraged to utilize facilities to minimize the total number of children and staff in any one facility.

7.
With respect to child care programs, the Secretary of the Agency of Human Services (“Human Services Secretary”) shall oversee the implementation of this Directive and I hereby delegate to the Human Services
Secretary such authority as may be necessary for this implementation in accordance with the below:

a.
During the Closure Period, state-licensed child care programs are asked to provide care to, at a minimum, their own enrollees who are children of Essential Persons. In providing this care, child care
centers must practice hygiene and social distancing best practices as set forth by VDH.

b.
State-licensed child care centers are encouraged to also provide extended care — before and after normal operating hours — to enrollees who are children of Essential Persons and to work with CDD to provide
care for those not presently enrollees in their facilities who are children of Essential Persons.

c.
Our licensing office of CDD will work with licensed child care centers to use best judgment to waive to the fullest extent possible all relevant licensing rules in order to permit child care centers to
serve children of Essential Persons during the Closure Period.

d.
During the Closure Period, the State shall continue to provide current levels of tuition payments on behalf of eligible families to: (a) all child care programs serving CCFAP-eligible children; and (b)
child care programs and schools providing services under Act 166 for pre-K students.

e.
CDD shall have authority, using its best judgment, to waive to the fullest extent possible all relevant licensing rules and regulations, including penalties, in order to permit licensed child care programs
to serve children of Essential Persons during the Closure Period.

f.
The Human Services Secretary shall develop options for additional per-child-served funding to all child care centers that serve children of Essential Persons during the Closure Period.

8.
To support child care centers in staying open, supporting their employees, and remaining in business during this emergency and afterward, all State Agencies shall collaborate and align resources as directed
by the Human Services Secretary, in consultation with the Governor, to support child care providers in accordance with this Directive.

9.
State Agencies shall collaborate on continuity of mental health services to children and their families during the Closure Period, as directed by the Human Services Secretary, in consultation with the
Governor.

10.
All child care providers, school administrators, teachers and staff shall follow guidance issued by the Department of Health to ensure a healthy workplace during the Closure Period.

11.
Pursuant to the powers granted to the Governor in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other provisions of law, I shall from time to time issue recommendations, directives and orders as circumstances may require.

This Directive shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 6, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and Agency of Human Services, the Department of Public Safety/Division
of Emergency Management, and the Agency of Education shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Directive.

Dated March 17, 2020

GUBERNATORIAL DIRECTIVE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES

DIRECTIVE 3 — DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES SUSPENSION OF IN-PERSON TRANSACTIONS

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued an Executive Order declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, since that time, many additional cases of COVID-19 have been tested as presumptively positive in the State; and

WHEREAS, the Governor and the Department of Health have been very clear that social distancing measures are essential in order to curb the rapid spread of COVID-19 and minimize the risk to the public, maintain the health and safety of Vermonters, and
limit the spread of infection in our communities; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Health and the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles (“DMV”), has determined that consistent with current guidance it is essential to restrict in-person visits
to the DMV district offices; and

WHEREAS, on Monday, March 16, 2020, the Governor announced that the Department of Motor Vehicles (“DMV”) will be extending license and registration renewals for 90 days beyond their effective expiration date beginning March 13, 2020 in order to limit
in-person visits to the DMV district offices; and

WHEREAS, as of the close of business on Thursday, March 19, 2020, DMV shall provide online, mail and phone services, and suspend all in-person transactions; and

WHEREAS, this decision is based on the best scientific evidence available to the experts at the Vermont Department of Health and is expected to help prevent and reduce the spread of COVID-19.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws, hereby direct the Department of Motor
Vehicles as follows:

1.
DMV services shall be provided online, by mail or phone, and all in-person transactions shall be suspended for the period of the State of Emergency.

2
In order to meet the needs of DMV customers, the Commissioner of the DMV shall develop a Continuity of DMV Services Plan that includes, at a minimum:

a.
Effective March 13, 2020, license and registration renewals shall be extended for 90 days beyond their effective expiration date.

b.
All license and non-driver ID renewal applications shall be processed by mail or on-line, so long as the applicant photographs that would otherwise be non-compliant with state law, shall be compliant
with the federal government’s REAL ID Act.

c.
Registrations and filings for the International Registration plan (IRP) and the International Fuel Tax Agreement (IFTA) shall be extended for 90 days beyond their effective expiration date.

d.
Temporary registration certificates and number plates shall be valid for 90 days.

e.
Driver permits or license examinations postponed shall be scheduled within a reasonable period of time following the termination of the state of emergency.

f.
“Lemon law” complaints received during the state of emergency period or complaints which were pending at the commencement of the state of emergency which may need to be postponed shall be heard within
a reasonable period of time following the termination of the state of emergency.

3.
The Commissioner of Motor vehicles shall develop such policies and procedures necessary to facilitate the processing of registrations, renewals, transfer registrations and other services by mail, phone
and on-line and address the concerns of DMV customers.

4.
Pursuant to the powers granted to the Governor in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other provisions of law, I shall from time to time issue recommendations, directives and orders as circumstances may require.

5.
The Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles shall oversee the implementation of this Directive.

This Directive shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until April 6, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health, the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management
and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Directive.

Dated March 18, 2020

AMENDMENT TO GOVERNOR’S DIRECTIVE 3 TO THE DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and almost two months later Vermont has experienced almost 1,000 cases and over 50 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Executive Order expressly recognized the critical need to minimize the risk to the public, maintain the health and safety of Vermonters, and limit the spread of infection in our communities and within our healthcare facilities and directed